Florida, session 2026, SB7028.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 33 34 Section 1.âSubsection (7) of section 121.053, Florida 35 Statutes, is amended to read: 36 121.053âParticipation in the Elected Officersâ Class for 37 retired members.â 38 (7)âA member who is elected or appointed to an elective 39 office and who is participating in the Deferred Retirement 40 Option Program is not subject to termination as defined in s. 41 121.021, or reemployment limitations as provided in s. 42 121.091(9), until the end of his or her current term of office 43 or, if the officer is consecutively elected or reelected to an 44 elective office eligible for coverage under the Florida 45 Retirement System, until he or she no longer holds an elective 46 office, as follows: 47 (a)âAt the end of the memberâs DROP period: 48 1.âThe officerâs DROP account may not accrue additional 49 monthly benefits, but does continue to earn interest as provided 50 in s. 121.091(13). However, an officer whose DROP participation 51 begins on or after July 1, 2010, may not continue to earn such 52 interest. 53 2.âRetirement contributions, except for unfunded actuarial 54 liability and health insurance subsidy contributions required in 55 ss. 121.71(5) and 121.76, are not required of the employer of 56 the elected officer, and additional retirement credit may not be 57 earned under the Florida Retirement System. 58 3.âThe officer, except while serving as a legislator, may 59 remain in elective office and receive his or her accumulated 60 DROP proceeds, including interest earned in accordance with 61 subparagraph 1., after attaining the age of 59 1/2 years. 62 (b)âAn elected officer may voluntarily terminate his or her 63 elective office at any time and receive his or her DROP 64 proceeds. However, until termination occurs, an elected officer 65 whose termination limitations are extended by this section is 66 ineligible for renewed membership in the system and may not 67 receive pension payments, DROP lump sum payments, or any other 68 state payment other than the statutorily determined salary, 69 travel, and per diem for the elective office. 70 (c)âUpon termination, the officer shall receive his or her 71 accumulated DROP account, including plus interest earned in 72 accordance with subparagraph (a)1., and shall accrue and 73 commence receiving monthly retirement benefits, which must be 74 paid on a prospective basis only. 75 Section 2.âSubsection (5) of section 121.091, Florida 76 Statutes, is amended to read: 77 121.091âBenefits payable under the system.âBenefits may not 78 be paid under this section unless the member has terminated 79 employment as provided in s. 121.021(39)(a) or begun 80 participation in the Deferred Retirement Option Program as 81 provided in subsection (13), and a proper application has been 82 filed in the manner prescribed by the department. The department 83 may cancel an application for retirement benefits when the 84 member or beneficiary fails to timely provide the information 85 and documents required by this chapter and the departmentâs 86 rules. The department shall adopt rules establishing procedures 87 for application for retirement benefits and for the cancellation 88 of such application when the required information or documents 89 are not received. 90 (5)âTERMINATION BENEFITS.âA member whose employment is 91 terminated prior to retirement retains membership rights to 92 previously earned member-noncontributory service credit, and to 93 member-contributory service credit, if the member leaves the 94 member contributions on deposit in his or her retirement 95 account. If a terminated member receives a refund of member 96 contributions, such member may reinstate membership rights to 97 the previously earned service credit represented by the refund 98 by completing 1 year of creditable service and repaying the 99 refunded member contributions, plus interest. 100 (a)âA member whose employment is terminated for any reason 101 other than death or retirement before becoming vested is 102 entitled to the return of his or her accumulated contributions 103 as of the date of termination. Effective July 1, 2011, upon 104 termination of employment from all participating employers for 3 105 calendar months as defined in s. 121.021(39)(c) for any reason 106 other than retirement, a member may receive a refund of all 107 contributions he or she has made to the pension plan, subject to 108 the restrictions otherwise provided in this chapter. The refund 109 may be received as a lump-sum payment, a rollover to a qualified 110 plan, or a combination of these methods. Partial refunds are not 111 permitted. The refund may not include any interest earnings on 112 the contributions for a member of the pension plan. Employer 113 contributions made on behalf of the member are not refundable. A 114 member may not receive a refund of employee contributions if a 115 pending or an approved qualified domestic relations order is 116 filed against his or her retirement account. By obtaining a 117 refund of contributions, a member waives all rights under the 118 Florida Retirement System and the health insurance subsidy to 119 the service credit represented by the refunded contributions, 120 except the right to purchase his or her prior service credit in 121 accordance with s. 121.081(2). 122 (b)âA member whose employment is terminated for any reason 123 other than death or retirement after becoming vested may elect 124 to receive a deferred monthly benefit which shall begin to 125 accrue on the first day of the month of normal or early 126 retirement and shall be payable on the last day of that month 127 and each month thereafter during his or her lifetime. The amount 128 of monthly benefit shall be computed in the same manner as for a 129 normal retirement benefit in accordance with subsection (1) or 130 early retirement benefit in accordance with s. 121.021(30), but 131 based on average monthly compensation and creditable service as 132 of the date of termination. 133 (c)âIn lieu of the deferred monthly benefit provided in 134 paragraph (b), the terminated member may elect to receive a 135 lump-sum amount equal to his or her accumulated contributions as 136 of the date of termination. Effective July 1, 2011, upon 137 termination of employment from all participating employers for 3 138 calendar months as defined in s. 121.021(39)(c) for any reason 139 other than retirement, a member may receive a refund of all 140 contributions he or she has made to the pension plan, subject to 141 the restrictions otherwise provided in this chapter. Partial 142 refunds are not permitted. The refund may not include any 143 interest earnings on the contributions for a member of the 144 pension plan. Employer contributions made on behalf of the 145 member are not refundable. A member may not receive a refund of 146 employee contributions if a pending or an approved qualified 147 domestic relations order is filed against his or her retirement 148 account. By obtaining a refund of contributions, a member waives 149 all rights under the Florida Retirement System and the health 150 insurance subsidy to the service credit represented by the 151 refunded contributions, except the right to purchase his or her 152 prior service credit in accordance with s. 121.081(2). 153 (d)âIf any retired member dies without having received in 154 benefit payments an amount equal to his or her accumulated 155 contributions, there shall be payable to his or her designated 156 beneficiary an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the 157 memberâs accumulated contributions over the total monthly 158 payments made to the member prior to the date of death. 159 (e)âA member shall be deemed a terminated member when 160 termination of employment has occurred as provided in s. 161 121.021(39). 162 (f)âAny member who has been found guilty by a verdict of a 163 jury, or by the court trying the case without a jury, of 164 committing, aiding, or abetting any embezzlement or theft from 165 his or her employer, bribery in connection with the employment, 166 or other felony specified in chapter 838, except ss. 838.15 and 167 838.16, committed prior to retirement, or who has entered a plea 168 of guilty or of nolo contendere to such crime, or any member 169 whose employment is terminated by reason of the memberâs 170 admitted commitment, aiding, or abetting of an embezzlement or 171 theft from his or her employer, bribery, or other felony 172 specified in chapter 838, except ss. 838.15 and 838.16, shall 173 forfeit all rights and benefits under this chapter, except the 174 return of his or her accumulated contributions as of the date of 175 termination. 176 (g)âAny elected official who is convicted by the Senate of 177 an impeachable offense shall forfeit all rights and benefits 178 under this chapter, except the return of his or her accumulated 179 contributions as of the date of the conviction. 180 (h)âAny member who, prior to retirement, is adjudged by a 181 court of competent jurisdiction to have violated any state law 182 against strikes by public employees, or who has been found 183 guilty by such court of violating any state law prohibiting 184 strikes by public employees, shall forfeit all rights and 185 benefits under this chapter, except the return of his or her 186 accumulated contributions as of the date of the conviction. 187 (i)âThe division or the state board may not pay benefits to 188 any member convicted of a felony committed on or after October 189 1, 2008, defined in s. 800.04 against a victim younger than 16 190 years of age, or defined in chapter 794 against a victim younger 191 than 18 years of age, through the use or attempted use of power, 192 rights, privileges, duties, or position of the memberâs public 193 office or employment position. However, the division or the 194 state board shall return the memberâs accumulated contributions, 195 if any, that the member accumulated as of the date of 196 conviction. 197 (j)âAny beneficiary who by a verdict of a jury or by the 198 court trying the case without a jury is found guilty, or who has 199 entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, of unlawfully and 200 intentionally killing or procuring the death of the member 201 forfeits all rights to the deceased memberâs benefits under this 202 chapter, and the benefits will be paid as if such beneficiary 203 had predeceased the decedent. 204 (k)âBenefits may not be paid by the division or the state 205 board pending final resolution of such charges against a member 206 or beneficiary if the resolution of such charges could require 207 the forfeiture of benefits as provided in paragraph (f), 208 paragraph (g), paragraph (h), paragraph (i), paragraph (j), or 209 chapter 112. 210 (l)âThe division and the state board, as appropriate, must 211 take steps to recoup from the elected officer any DROP proceeds 212 distributed pursuant to s. 121.053(7)(a)3. if: 213 1.âSuch DROP proceeds were distributed before the elected 214 officerâs termination; and 215 2.âThe division or state board would be prohibited pursuant 216 to paragraph (k) from making a distribution to the elected 217 officer, absent the distribution to the elected officer pursuant 218 to s. 121.053(7)(a)3. 219 Section 3.âPresent subsections (5) through (9) of section 220 121.101, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (6) 221 through (10), respectively, and a new subsection (5) is added to 222 that section, to read: 223 121.101âCost-of-living adjustment of benefits.â 224 (5)(a)âCommencing July 1, 2026, and in lieu of any annual 225 adjustment authorized in paragraph (4)(b) occurring after the 226 fifth anniversary of retirement of an eligible Special Risk 227 Class member whose effective retirement date is on or after July 228 1, 2011, the adjusted monthly benefit of each eligible Special 229 Risk Class retiree and annuitant shall be the amount of the 230 monthly benefit being received on June 30 immediately preceding 231 the adjustment date plus the greater of the amount determined by 232 multiplying the benefit by the factor calculated pursuant to 233 paragraph (4)(c) or the amount equal to 1.5 percent of this 234 benefit. 235 (b)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term âeligible 236 Special Risk Class retireeâ means a retiree: 237 1.âInitially enrolled in the Florida Retirement System 238 prior to July 1, 2011, who has completed at least 72 calendar 239 months of creditable service as a Special Risk Class member; or 240 2.âInitially enrolled in the Florida Retirement System on 241 or after July 1, 2011, who has completed at least 96 calendar 242 months of creditable service as a Special Risk Class member. 243 Section 4.âSubsections (4) and (5) of section 121.71, 244 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 245 121.71âUniform rates; process; calculations; levy.â 246 (4)âRequired employer retirement contribution rates for 247 each membership class and subclass of the Florida Retirement 248 System for both retirement plans are as follows: 249 250 Membership Class Percentage ofGrossCompensation,EffectiveJuly 1, 2026 2025 251 252 Regular Class 7.11% 7.10% 253 Special Risk Class 21.58% 20.10% 254 Special RiskâAdministrativeâSupport Class 11.45% 10.88% 255 Elected Officersâ ClassââLegislators, Governor,âLt. Governor,âCabinet Officers,âState Attorneys,âPublic Defenders 10.30% 10.04% 256 Elected Officersâ ClassââJustices, Judges 15.54% 15.62% 257 Elected Officersâ ClassââCounty Elected Officers 11.45% 11.79% 258 Senior Management Service Class 8.68% 8.73% 259 DROP 9.86% 9.37% 260 (5)âIn order to address unfunded actuarial liabilities of 261 the system, the required employer retirement contribution rates 262 for each membership class and subclass of the Florida Retirement 263 System for both retirement plans are as follows: 264 265 Membership Class Percentage ofGrossCompensation,EffectiveJuly 1, 2026 2025 266 267 Regular Class 4.42% 4.87% 268 Special Risk Class 14.10% 13.03% 269 Special RiskâAdministrativeâSupport Class 28.28% 26.54% 270 Elected Officersâ ClassââLegislators, Governor,âLt. Governor,âCabinet Officers,âState Attorneys,âPublic Defenders 51.43% 50.56% 271 Elected Officersâ ClassââJustices, Judges 28.40% 28.46% 272 Elected Officersâ ClassââCounty Elected Officers 41.49% 40.72% 273 Senior Management Service Class 21.86% 22.45% 274 DROP 10.26% 10.65% 275 Section 5.âSubsection (3) of section 121.73, Florida 276 Statutes, is amended to read: 277 121.73âAllocations for member disability coverage; 278 percentage amounts.â 279 (3)âEffective July 1, 2026 2002, allocations from the 280 Florida Retirement System Contributions Clearing Trust Fund to 281 provide disability coverage for members in the investment plan, 282 and to offset the costs of administering said coverage, are as 283 follows: 284 285 Membership Class Percentage of Gross Compensation 286 287 Regular Class 0.25% 288 Special Risk Class 1.91% 1.85% 289 Special Risk Administrative Support Class 0.46% 0.45% 290 Elected Officersâ ClassââLegislators, Governor,âLt. Governor, Cabinet Officers,âState Attorneys, Public Defenders 0.41% 291 Elected Officersâ ClassââJustices, Judges 0.73% 292 Elected Officersâ ClassââCounty Elected Officers 0.41% 293 Senior Management Service Class 0.26% 294 Section 6.âSubsection (3) of section 121.735, Florida 295 Statutes, is amended to read: 296 121.735âAllocations for member line-of-duty death benefits; 297 percentage amounts.â 298 (3)âAllocations from the Florida Retirement System 299 Contributions Clearing Trust Fund to provide line-of-duty death 300 benefits for members in the investment plan and to offset the 301 costs of administering said coverage, are as follows: 302 303 Membership Class Percentage of Gross Compensation 304 305 Regular Class 0.05% 306 Special Risk Class 1.28% 1.26% 307 Special Risk Administrative Support Class 0.03% 308 Elected Officersâ ClassââLegislators, Governor,âLt. Governor, Cabinet Officers,âState Attorneys, Public Defenders 0.15% 309 Elected Officersâ ClassââJustices, Judges 0.09% 310 Elected Officersâ ClassââCounty Elected Officers 0.20% 311 Senior Management Service Class 0.05% 312 Section 7.âThe Legislature finds that a proper and 313 legitimate state purpose is served when employees, officers, and 314 retirees of the state and its political subdivisions, and the 315 dependents, survivors, and beneficiaries of such employees, 316 officers, and retirees, are extended the basic protections 317 afforded by governmental retirement systems. These persons must 318 be provided benefits that are fair and adequate and that are 319 managed, administered, and funded in an actuarially sound manner 320 as required by s. 14, Article X of the State Constitution and 321 part VII of chapter 112, Florida Statutes. Therefore, the 322 Legislature determines and declares that this act fulfills an 323 important state interest. 324 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.